Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4739
Birthing facility; confirmatory testing facility; reports required.

(1) Every birthing facility shall annually report to the Department of Health and Human Services the number of:

(a) Newborns born;

(b) Newborns and infants recommended for a hearing screening test;

(c) Newborns who received a hearing screening test during birth admission;

(d) Newborns who passed a hearing screening test during birth admission if administered;

(e) Newborns who did not pass a hearing screening test during birth admission if administered; and

(f) Newborns recommended for monitoring, intervention, and followup care.

(2) Every confirmatory testing facility shall annually report to the Department of Health and Human Services the number of:

(a) Newborns and infants who return for a followup hearing test;

(b) Newborns and infants who do not have a hearing loss based upon the followup hearing test; and

(c) Newborns and infants who are shown to have a hearing loss based upon the followup hearing test.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 46;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 593.